Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.08.040

Diminished capacity—Victim identity.

A defendant does not suffer from diminished capacity based on the discovery of, knowledge about, or potential disclosure of the victim's actual or perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, including under circumstances in which the victim made an unwanted nonforcible romantic or sexual advance towards the defendant, or in which the defendant and victim dated or had a romantic or sexual relationship.

[ 2020 c 3 s 1.]

NOTES:

Short title—2020 c 3: "This act may be known and cited as the Nikki Kuhnhausen act." [ 2020 c 3 s 3.]